California statutes. Probate Code
If the decedent dies while domiciled in a sister state, a personal representative appointed by a court of the decedent’s domicile has priority over all other persons except where the decedent’s will nominates a different person to be the personal representative in this state. The sister state personal representative may nominate another person as personal representative and the nominee has the same priority as the sister state personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Probate of Nondomiciliary Decedent’s Will Admitted to Probate in Sister State or Foreign Nation [12520. - 12524.]

12520.

(a) If a nondomiciliary decedent’s will has been admitted to probate in a sister state or foreign nation and satisfies the requirements of this article, probate of the will in an ancillary administration proceeding is governed by this article.

(b) If a nondomiciliary decedent’s will has been admitted to probate in a sister state or foreign nation, but does not satisfy the requirements of this article, the will may be probated in an ancillary administration proceeding pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 8000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12521.

(a) A petition for probate of a nondomiciliary decedent’s will under this article shall include both of the following:

(1) The will or an authenticated copy of the will.

(2) An authenticated copy of the order admitting the will to probate in the sister state or foreign nation or other evidence of the establishment or proof of the will in accordance with the law of the sister state or foreign nation.

(b) As used in this section, “authenticated copy” means a copy that satisfies the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1530) of Chapter 2 of Division 11 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12522.

If a will of a nondomiciliary decedent was admitted to probate, or established or proved, in accordance with the laws of a sister state, the court shall admit the will to probate in this state, and may not permit a contest or revocation of probate, unless one or more of the following are shown:

(a) The determination in the sister state is not based on a finding that at the time of death the decedent was domiciled in the sister state.

(b) One or more interested parties were not given notice and an opportunity for contest in the proceedings in the sister state.

(c) The determination in the sister state is not final.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12523.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if a will of a nondomiciliary decedent was admitted to probate, or established or proved, in accordance with the laws of a foreign nation, the court shall admit the will to probate in this state, and may not permit a contest or revocation of probate, if it appears from the order admitting the will to probate in the foreign nation, or otherwise appears, that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The determination in the foreign nation is based on a finding that at the time of death the decedent was domiciled in the foreign nation.

(2) All interested parties were given notice and an opportunity for contest in the proceedings in the foreign nation.

(3) The determination in the foreign nation is final.

(b) The court may refuse to admit the will, even though it is shown to satisfy the conditions provided in subdivision (a), where the order admitting the will was made under a judicial system that does not provide impartial tribunals or procedures compatible with the requirements of due process of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12524.

A nondomiciliary decedent’s will admitted to probate under this article has the same force and effect as the will of a person who dies while domiciled in this state that is admitted to probate in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of General Provisions [12530. - 12530.]

12530.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in this chapter, ancillary administration of a decedent’s estate is subject to all other provisions of this code concerning the administration of the decedent’s estate, including, but not limited to, opening estate administration, inventory and appraisal, creditor claims, estate management, independent administration, compensation, accounts, payment of debts, distribution, and closing estate administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Distribution of Property to Sister State Personal Representative [12540. - 12542.]

12540.

(a) If a person dies while domiciled in a sister state, the court in an ancillary administration proceeding may make an order for preliminary or final distribution of all or part of the decedent’s personal property in this state to the sister state personal representative if distribution is in the best interest of the estate or interested persons.

(b) The court order shall be made in the manner and pursuant to the procedure provided in, and is subject to the provisions of, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11600) of Part 10.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12541.

If necessary to make distribution pursuant to this article, real property in the nondomiciliary decedent’s estate may be sold and the court may order the proceeds to be distributed to the sister state personal representative. The sale shall be made in the same manner as other sales of real property of a decedent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12542.

If the nondomiciliary decedent’s estate in the sister state where the decedent was domiciled is insolvent, distribution may be made only to the sister state personal representative and not to the beneficiaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Collection of Personal Property of Small Estate by Sister State Personal Representative Without Ancillary Administration [12570. - 12573.]

12570.

If a nondomiciliary decedent’s property in this state satisfies the requirements of Section 13100, a sister state personal representative may, without petitioning for ancillary administration, use the affidavit procedure provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 to collect personal property of the decedent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12571.

The effect of payment, delivery, or transfer of personal property to the sister state personal representative pursuant to this chapter, and the effect of failure to do so, are governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12572.

The sister state personal representative may bring an action against a holder of the decedent’s property, and may be awarded attorney’s fees, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 13105.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12573.

A sister state personal representative who takes property by affidavit under this chapter is not liable as a person to whom payment, delivery, or transfer of the decedent’s property is made under Section 13109 or 13110 to the extent that the sister state personal representative restores the property to the nondomiciliary decedent’s estate in the sister state in compliance with Section 13111.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Jurisdiction Over Foreign Personal Representative [12590. - 12591.]

12590.

A sister state personal representative or foreign nation personal representative submits personally in a representative capacity to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the estate by any of the following actions:

(a) Filing a petition for ancillary administration.

(b) Receiving money or other personal property pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12570). Jurisdiction under this subdivision is limited to the amount of money and the value of personal property received.

(c) Doing any act in this state as a personal representative that would have given this state jurisdiction over the personal representative as an individual.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12591.

A sister state personal representative or foreign nation personal representative is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in a representative capacity to the same extent that the nondomiciliary decedent was subject to jurisdiction at the time of death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. DISPOSITION OF ESTATE WITHOUT ADMINISTRATION [13000. - 13660.]



PART 1. COLLECTION OR TRANSFER OF SMALL ESTATE WITHOUT ADMINISTRATION [13000. - 13211.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [13000. - 13007.]

13000.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.

“Holder of the decedent’s property” or “holder” means, with respect to any particular item of property of the decedent, the person owing money to the decedent, having custody of tangible personal property of the decedent, or acting as registrar or transfer agent of the evidences of a debt, obligation, interest, right, security, or chose in action belonging to the decedent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.

(a) “Particular item of property” means: 

(1) Particular personal property of the decedent which is sought to be collected, received, or transferred by the successor of the decedent under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100). 

(2) Particular real property of the decedent, or particular real and personal property of the decedent, for which the successor of the decedent seeks a court order determining succession under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13150). 

(3) Particular real property of the decedent with respect to which the successor of the decedent files an affidavit of succession under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13200). 

(b) Subject to subdivision (a), “particular item of property” includes all interests specified in Section 62.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.

“Property of the decedent,” “decedent’s property,” “money due the decedent,” and similar phrases, include property that becomes part of the decedent’s estate on the decedent’s death, whether by designation of the estate as beneficiary under an insurance policy on the decedent’s life or under the decedent’s retirement plan, or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

13006.

“Successor of the decedent” means:

(a) If the decedent died leaving a will, the sole beneficiary or all of the beneficiaries who succeeded to a particular item of property of the decedent under the decedent’s will. For the purposes of this part, a trust is a beneficiary under the decedent’s will if the trust succeeds to the particular item of property under the decedent’s will. 

(b) If the decedent died without a will, the sole person or all of the persons who succeeded to the particular item of property of the decedent under Sections 6401 and 6402 or, if the law of a sister state or foreign nation governs succession to the particular item of property, under the law of the sister state or foreign nation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

13007.

“Proceeding” means either that a petition is currently pending in this state for administration of a decedent’s estate under Division 7 (commencing with Section 7000), a special administrator for the decedent’s estate has been appointed in this state and is now serving, or a personal representative for the decedent’s estate has been appointed in this state with general powers. “Proceeding” does not include a petition for administration which was dismissed without the appointment of a personal representative, any proceeding under Division 8 (commencing with Section 13000), or any action or proceeding in another state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 871, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [13050. - 13054.]

13050.

(a) For the purposes of this part:

(1) Any property or interest or lien thereon that, at the time of the decedent’s death, was held by the decedent as a joint tenant, or in which the decedent had a life or other interest terminable upon the decedent’s death, or that was held by the decedent and passed to the decedent’s surviving spouse pursuant to Section 13500, shall be excluded in determining the property or estate of the decedent or its value. This excluded property shall include, but not be limited to, property in a trust revocable by the decedent during the decedent’s lifetime.

(2) A multiple-party account to which the
 decedent was a party at the time of the decedent’s death shall be excluded in determining the property or estate of the decedent or its value, whether or not all or a portion of the sums on deposit are community property, to the extent that the sums on deposit belong after the death of the decedent to a surviving party, P.O.D. payee, or beneficiary. For the purposes of this paragraph, the terms “multiple-party account,” “party,” “P.O.D. payee,” and “beneficiary” are defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5120) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 5.

(b) For the purposes of this part, all of the following property shall be excluded in determining the property or estate of the decedent or its value:

(1) Any vehicle registered under Division 3 (commencing with Section
 4000) of the Vehicle Code or titled under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code.

(2) Any vessel numbered under Division 3.5 (commencing with Section 9840) of the Vehicle Code.

(3) Any manufactured home, mobilehome, commercial coach, truck camper, or floating home registered under Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) For the purposes of this part, the value of the following property shall be excluded in determining the value of the decedent’s property in this state:

(1) Any amounts due to the decedent for services in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) The amount, not exceeding sixteen thousand six hundred twenty-five dollars ($16,625), as adjusted periodically in accordance with Section 890, of salary or other compensation, including compensation for unused vacation, owing to the decedent for personal services from any employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 4.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13051.

For the purposes of this part:

(a) The guardian or conservator of the estate of a person entitled to any of the decedent’s property may act on behalf of the person without authorization or approval of the court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending. 

(b) The trustee of a trust may act on behalf of the trust. In the case of a trust that is subject to continuing jurisdiction of the court pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17300) of Part 5 of Division 9, the trustee may act on behalf of the trust without the need to obtain approval of the court. 

(c) If the decedent’s will authorizes a custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of any state to receive a devise to a beneficiary, the custodian may act on behalf of the beneficiary until such time as the custodianship terminates. 

(d) A sister state personal representative may act on behalf of the beneficiaries as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12570) of Part 13 of Division 7.

(e) The attorney in fact authorized under a durable power of attorney may act on behalf of the beneficiary giving the power of attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

13052.

In making an appraisal for the purposes of this part, the probate referee shall use the date of the decedent’s death as the date of valuation of the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13053.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this part applies whether the decedent died before, on, or after July 1, 1987.

(b) This part does not apply and the law in effect at the time of payment, delivery, or transfer shall apply if the payment, delivery, or transfer was made prior to July 1, 1987, pursuant to former Probate Code Sections 630 to 632, inclusive, repealed by Chapter 783 of the Statutes of 1986.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13054.

A reference in any statute of this state or in a written instrument, including a will or trust, to a provision of former Sections 630 to 632, inclusive, repealed by Chapter 783, Statutes of 1986, shall be deemed to be a reference to the comparable provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Affidavit Procedure for Collection or Transfer of Personal Property [13100. - 13117.]

13100.

Excluding the property described in Section 13050 and any property included in a petition filed under Section 13151, if the gross value of the decedent’s real and personal property in this state does not exceed one hundred sixty-six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($166,250), as adjusted periodically in accordance with Section 890, and if 40 days have elapsed since the death of the decedent, the successor of the decedent may, without procuring letters of administration or awaiting probate of the will, do any of the following with respect to one or more particular items of property:

(a) Collect any particular item of property that is money due the decedent.

(b) Receive any particular item of property that is tangible personal property of the decedent.

(c) Have any particular item of property that is evidence of a debt, obligation, interest, right, security, or chose in action belonging to the decedent transferred, whether or not secured by a lien on real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 331, Sec. 1.   (AB 2016)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13100.5.

The following definitions apply for the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Transferee” means a person to whom payment, delivery, or transfer of property is made under this chapter.

(b) “Transferred property” means property that is paid, delivered, or transferred pursuant to an affidavit or declaration executed under Section 13101.

(c) “Unsecured debts” includes, but is not limited to, a decedent’s funeral expenses, expenses of a decedent’s last illness, and wage claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13101.

(a) To collect money, receive tangible personal property, or have evidences of a debt, obligation, interest, right, security, or chose in action transferred under this chapter, an affidavit or a declaration under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state shall be furnished to the holder of the decedent’s property stating all of the following:

(1) The decedent’s name.

(2) The date and place of the decedent’s death.

(3) “At least 40 days have elapsed since the death of the decedent, as shown in a certified copy of the decedent’s death certificate attached to
 this affidavit or declaration.”

(4) Either of the following, as appropriate:

(A) “No proceeding is now being or has been conducted in California for administration of the decedent’s estate.”

(B) “The decedent’s personal representative has consented in writing to the payment, transfer, or delivery to the affiant or declarant of the property described in the affidavit or declaration.”

(5) “The current gross fair market value of the decedent’s real and personal property in California, excluding the property described in Section 13050 of the California Probate Code and any property included in a petition filed under Section 13151 of the California Probate Code, does not
 exceed [Insert dollar amount specified in subdivision (g) of Section 13101 of the California Probate Code].”

(6) A description of the property of the decedent that is to be paid, transferred, or delivered to the affiant or declarant.

(7) The name of the successor of the decedent, as defined in Section 13006, to the described property.

(8) Either of the following, as appropriate:

(A) “The affiant or declarant is the successor of the decedent (as defined in Section 13006 of the California Probate Code) to the decedent’s interest in the described property.”

(B) “The affiant or declarant is
 authorized under Section 13051 of the California Probate Code to act on behalf of the successor of the decedent (as defined in Section 13006 of the California Probate Code) with respect to the decedent’s interest in the described property.”

(9) “No other person has a superior right to the interest of the decedent in the described property.”

(10) “The affiant or declarant requests that the described property be paid, delivered, or transferred to the affiant or declarant.”

(11) “The affiant or declarant affirms or declares under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing is true and correct.”

(b) Where more than one person
 executes the affidavit or declaration under this section, the statements required by subdivision (a) shall be modified as appropriate to reflect that fact.

(c) If the particular item of property to be transferred under this chapter is a debt or other obligation secured by a lien on real property and the instrument creating the lien has been recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county where the real property is located, the affidavit or declaration shall satisfy the requirements both of this section and of Section 13106.5.

(d) A certified copy of the decedent’s death certificate shall be attached to the affidavit or declaration.

(e) If the decedent’s personal representative has consented to the payment,
 transfer, or delivery of the described property to the affiant or declarant, a copy of the consent and of the personal representative’s letters shall be attached to the affidavit or declaration.

(f) If the decedent dies on or after April 1, 2022, the list of adjusted dollar amounts, published in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 890, in effect on the date of the decedent’s death, shall be attached to the affidavit or declaration.

(g) (1) If the decedent dies prior to April 1, 2022, the dollar amount for paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) is one hundred sixty-six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($166,250).

(2) If the decedent dies on or after April 1, 2022, the dollar amount for paragraph (5)
 of subdivision (a) is the adjusted dollar amount, published in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 890, in effect on the date of the decedent’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 331, Sec. 2.   (AB 2016)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

(a) If the decedent had evidence of ownership of the property described in the affidavit or declaration and the holder of the property would have had the right to require presentation of the evidence of ownership before the duty of the holder to pay, deliver, or transfer the property to the decedent would have arisen, the evidence of ownership, if available, shall be presented with the affidavit or declaration to the holder of the decedent’s property.

(b) If the evidence of ownership is not presented to the holder pursuant to subdivision (a), the holder may require, as a condition for the payment, delivery, or transfer of the property, that the person presenting the affidavit or declaration provide the holder with a bond or undertaking in a reasonable amount determined by the holder to be sufficient to indemnify the holder against all liability, claims, demands, loss, damages, costs, and expenses that the holder may incur or suffer by reason of the payment, delivery, or transfer of the property. Nothing in this subdivision precludes the holder and the person presenting the affidavit or declaration from dispensing with the requirement that a bond or undertaking be provided and instead entering into an agreement satisfactory to the holder concerning the duty of the person presenting the affidavit or declaration to indemnify the holder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

If the estate of the decedent includes any real property in this state, the affidavit or declaration shall be accompanied by an inventory and appraisal of the real property. The inventory and appraisal of the real property shall be made as provided in Part 3 (commencing with Section 8800) of Division 7. The appraisal shall be made by a probate referee selected by the affiant or declarant from those probate referees appointed by the Controller under Section 400 to appraise property in the county where the real property is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13104.

(a) Reasonable proof of the identity of each person executing the affidavit or declaration shall be provided to the holder of the decedent’s property. 

(b) Reasonable proof of identity is provided for the purposes of this section if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The person executing the affidavit or declaration is personally known to the holder.

(2) The person executes the affidavit or declaration in the presence of the holder.

(c) If the affidavit or declaration is executed in the presence of the holder, a written statement under penalty of perjury by a person personally known to the holder affirming the identity of the person executing the affidavit or declaration is reasonable proof of identity for the purposes of this section.

(d) If the affidavit or declaration is executed in the presence of the holder, the holder may reasonably rely on any of the following as reasonable proof of identity for the purposes of this section:

(1) An identification card or driver’s license issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles of this state that is current or was issued during the preceding five years.

(2) A passport issued by the Department of State of the United States that is current or was issued during the preceding five years.

(3) Any of the following documents if the document is current or was issued during the preceding five years and contains a photograph and description of the person named on it, is signed by the person, and bears a serial or other identifying number:

(A) A passport issued by a foreign government that has been stamped by the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service.

(B) A driver’s license issued by a state other than California.

(C) An identification card issued by a state other than California.

(D) An identification card issued by any branch of the armed forces of the United States.

(e) For the purposes of this section, a notary public’s certificate of acknowledgment identifying the person executing the affidavit or declaration is reasonable proof of identity of the person executing the affidavit or declaration.

(f) Unless the affidavit or declaration contains a notary public’s certificate of acknowledgment of the identity of the person, the holder shall note on the affidavit or declaration either that the person executing the affidavit or declaration is personally known or a description of the identification provided by the person executing the affidavit or declaration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13105.

(a) If the requirements of Sections 13100 to 13104, inclusive, are satisfied:

(1) The person or persons executing the affidavit or declaration as successor of the decedent are entitled to have the property described in the affidavit or declaration paid, delivered, or transferred to them.

(2) A transfer agent of a security described in the affidavit or declaration shall change the registered ownership on the books of the corporation from the decedent to the person or persons executing the affidavit or declaration as successor of the decedent.

(b) If the holder of the decedent’s property refuses to pay, deliver, or transfer any personal property or evidence thereof to the successor of the decedent within a reasonable time, the successor may recover the property or compel its payment, delivery, or transfer in an action brought for that purpose against the holder of the property. If an action is brought against the holder under this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the person or persons bringing the action if the court finds that the holder of the decedent’s property acted unreasonably in refusing to pay, deliver, or transfer the property to them as required by subdivision (a).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13106.

(a) If the requirements of Sections 13100 to 13104, inclusive, are satisfied, receipt by the holder of the decedent’s property of the affidavit or declaration constitutes sufficient acquittance for the payment of money, delivery of property, or changing registered ownership of property pursuant to this chapter and discharges the holder from any further liability with respect to the money or property. The holder may rely in good faith on the statements in the affidavit or declaration and has no duty to inquire into the truth of any statement in the affidavit or declaration.

(b) If the requirements of Sections 13100 to 13104, inclusive, are satisfied, the holder of the decedent’s property is not liable for any taxes due to this state by reason of paying money, delivering property, or changing registered ownership of property pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13106.5.

(a) If the particular item of property transferred under this chapter is a debt or other obligation secured by a lien on real property and the instrument creating the lien has been recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county where the real property is located, the affidavit or declaration described in Section 13101 shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of that county and, in addition to the contents required by Section 13101, shall include both of the following:

(1) The recording reference of the instrument creating the lien.

(2) A notary public’s certificate of acknowledgment identifying each person executing the affidavit or declaration.

(b) The transfer under this chapter of the debt or obligation secured by a lien on real property has the same effect as would be given to an assignment of the right to collect the debt or enforce the obligation. The recording of the affidavit or declaration under subdivision (a) shall be given the same effect as is given under Sections 2934 and 2935 of the Civil Code to recording an assignment of a mortgage and an assignment of the beneficial interest under a deed of trust.

(c) If a deed of trust upon the real property was given to secure the debt and the requirements of subdivision (a) and of Sections 13100 to 13103, inclusive, are satisfied:

(1) The trustee under the deed of trust may rely in good faith on the statements made in the affidavit or declaration and has no duty to inquire into the truth of any statement in the affidavit or declaration.

(2) A person acting in good faith and for a valuable consideration may rely upon a recorded reconveyance of the trustee under the deed of trust.

(d) If a mortgage upon the real property was given to secure the debt and the requirements of subdivision (a) and of Sections 13100 to 13103, inclusive, are satisfied, a person acting in good faith and for a valuable consideration may rely upon a recorded discharge of the mortgage executed by the person or persons executing the affidavit or declaration as successor of the decedent or by their successors in interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13107.

Where the money or property claimed in an affidavit or declaration presented under this chapter is that of a deceased heir or devisee of a deceased person whose estate is being administered in this state, the personal representative of the person whose estate is being administered shall present the affidavit or declaration to the court in which the estate is being administered. The court shall direct the personal representative to pay the money or deliver the property to the person or persons identified by the affidavit or declaration as the successor of the decedent to the extent that the order for distribution determines that the deceased heir or devisee was entitled to the money or property under the will or the laws of succession.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13107.5.

Where the money or property claimed in an affidavit or declaration executed under this chapter is the subject of a pending action or proceeding in which the decedent was a party, the successor of the decedent shall, without procuring letters of administration or awaiting probate of the will, be substituted as a party in place of the decedent by making a motion under Article 3 (commencing with Section 377.30) of Chapter 4 of Title 2 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The successor of the decedent shall file the affidavit or declaration with the court when the motion is made. For the purpose of Article 3 (commencing with Section 377.30) of Chapter 4 of Title 2 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, a successor of the decedent who complies with this chapter shall be considered as a successor in interest of the decedent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13108.

(a) The procedure provided by this chapter may be used only if one of the following requirements is satisfied: 

(1) No proceeding for the administration of the decedent’s estate is pending or has been conducted in this state.

(2) The decedent’s personal representative consents in writing to the payment, transfer, or delivery of the property described in the affidavit or declaration pursuant to this chapter. 

(b) Payment, delivery, or transfer of a decedent’s property pursuant to this chapter does not preclude later proceedings for administration of the decedent’s estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

13109.

(a) A transferee is personally liable, to the extent provided in this section for the unsecured debts of the decedent. That
 debt may be enforced against the transferee in the same manner as it could have been enforced against the decedent if the decedent had not died. In any action based upon the debt, the transferee may assert any defense, cross-complaint, or setoff that would have been available to the decedent if the decedent had not died. Nothing in this section permits enforcement of a claim that is barred under Part 4 (commencing with Section 9000) of Division 7. Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure applies in an action under this section.

(b) The personal liability under subdivision (a) shall not exceed the fair market value of the transferred property at the time the affidavit or declaration is presented under this chapter, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the transferred property at that time, and less the amount
 of any payment made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13110.

(c) A transferee is not liable under this section if the transferee has satisfied the requirements of Section 13109.5, 13110.5, or 13111.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 3.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13109.5.

(a) If proceedings for the administration of the decedent’s estate are commenced, a transferee is personally liable to the estate for a share of the decedent’s unsecured debts.

(b) In calculating the transferee’s share of liability under subdivision (a), the abatement rules provided in Part 4 (commencing with Section 21400) of Division 11 shall be applied, using all of the following assumptions:

(1) Transferred property shall be treated as if it had remained in the estate for administration.

(2) Any unsecured debts of the decedent that were paid by
 the transferee pursuant to Section 13109 shall be treated as if they
 were claims made against the decedent’s estate.

(c) The personal representative shall provide a written statement of liability to the transferee, which specifies the amount that must be paid to the estate.

(d) The transferee is personally liable to the estate for the amount specified in the statement of liability. Any amount that the transferee paid pursuant to Section 13109 or 13110 shall be credited against the amount that the transferee owes the estate under this subdivision. If the amount that the transferee paid pursuant to Section 13109 or 13110 exceeds the amount specified in the written statement of liability, the estate shall reimburse the difference to the transferee. For the purposes of Section 11420, that reimbursement shall be deemed an expense of
 administration.

(e) The reasonable cost of proceeding under this section shall be reimbursed as an extraordinary service under Sections 10801 and 10811. The transferee is liable for the payment of that cost, which shall be separately identified in the statement of liability.

(f) A transferee is not liable under this section if the transferee has satisfied the requirements of Section 13110.5 or 13111.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 4.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13110.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a transferee is personally liable to any person having a superior right to the transferred property by testate or intestate succession from the decedent. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the personal liability established by this subdivision shall not exceed the sum of the following, less the amount of any payment made pursuant to Section 13109 or 13109.5:

(1) The fair market value of the transferred property at the time the affidavit or declaration is presented under this chapter, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the transferred property at that time.

(2) Income received from the property, if that income would have accrued to the estate had the property not been transferred to the transferee.
